Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-568
Miscellaneous cash and revolving funds; authorized.

The budget division of the Department of Administrative Services shall administratively create such cash and revolving funds as may be required to properly account for the receipt of charges for use of applications and the payment of expenses for operation of the system. It is the intent of the Legislature that operations of the system shall be fully financed by user charges with the exception of development costs for new applications and initial costs of operation as applications progress to full operating status and are unable to generate sufficient fee revenue to finance operating costs.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 338;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 27.